Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1403
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 49-1404 to 49-1444 shall be used.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 232, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 49, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1021, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 45.
July 18, 2026